District of Columbia statutes.
28-4503

Monopolization.

It shall be unlawful for any person to monopolize, attempt to monopolize, or combine or conspire with any other person or persons to monopolize any part of trade or commerce, all or any part of which is within the District of Columbia.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368
This section is referenced in § 28-4506.
1981 Ed., § 28-4503.